test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-karnw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kaŗnõ: # Verb 49 'eng /est jõllitada/fin' - full paradigm
     kaŗnõ+V+Inf: kaŗnõ
     kaŗnõ+V+Ger: kaŗnõs
     kaŗnõ+V+Sup: kaŗnõm
     kaŗnõ+V+Sup+Ine: kaŗnõmõs
     kaŗnõ+V+Sup+Ela: kaŗnõmõst
     kaŗnõ+V+Sup+Tra: kaŗnõmõks
     kaŗnõ+V+Sup+Abe: kaŗnõmõt
     kaŗnõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaŗnõb
     kaŗnõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kaŗnõt
     kaŗnõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kaŗnõbõd
     kaŗnõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kaŗniz
     kaŗnõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [kaŗnizt, kaŗniztõ]
     kaŗnõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kaŗnizt, kaŗniztõ]
     kaŗnõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kaŗn
     kaŗnõ+V+Cond+Sg3: kaŗnõks
     kaŗnõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kaŗn
     kaŗnõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: kaŗn
     kaŗnõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kaŗnõgid
     kaŗnõ+V+Jus+Sg3: kaŗnõg
     kaŗnõ+V+Quo+Sg3: kaŗniji
     kaŗnõ+V+ActPrfPrc: kaŗnõn
     kaŗnõ+V+PssPrfPrc: kaŗndõd
